Utah statutes.
67-1-16.   Reservation of area for governor.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Architectural integrity" means the architectural elements, materials, color, and quality of the original building construction.

(b)  "Capitol hill" means the grounds, monuments, parking areas, buildings, and other man-made and natural objects within the area bounded by 300 North Street, Columbus Street, 500 North Street, and East Capitol Boulevard, and includes:

(i)  the White Community Memorial Chapel and its grounds and parking areas, and the Council Hall Travel Information Center building and its grounds and parking areas;

(ii)  the Daughters of the Utah Pioneers building and its grounds and parking areas and other state-owned property included within the area bounded by Columbus Street, North Main Street, and Apricot Avenue;

(iii)  the state-owned property included within the area bounded by Columbus Street, Wall Street, and 400 North Street; and

(iv)  the state-owned property included within the area bounded by Columbus Street, West Capitol Street, and 500 North Street.

(c)  "Governor area" means the chambers, rooms, hallways, lounges, parking lots, and parking garages designated by this section as being subject to governor control.

(d)  "House Building" means the west building on capitol hill that is located northwest of the State Capitol and southwest of the State Office Building.

(e)  "Legislative area" means the buildings, chambers, rooms, hallways, lounges, parking lots, and parking garages designated by this section as being subject to legislative control.

(f)  "Senate Building" means the east building on capitol hill that is located northeast of the State Capitol and southeast of the State Office Building.

(g)  "State Capitol" means the building dedicated as the Utah State Capitol in 1916.

(h)  "State Capitol Preservation Board" or "board" is as created in Section 63C-9-201.

(2)  The governor area on capitol hill includes:

(a)  in the State Capitol:

(i)  on the second floor: the entire floor including the stairways and elevators on the east and west side of the second floor, except:

(A)  the area reserved for the attorney general and the state auditor;

(B)  the committee room on the northeast side which is to be controlled and scheduled as provided in Subsection 36-5-1(2)(a)(iii);

(C)  the conference room on the south side, east of the southeast stairway, which is to be scheduled through the State Capitol Preservation Board;

(D)  the Gold Room, which is to be controlled by the governor and the Legislature and scheduled by the governor, with the governor being given scheduling priority; and the maintenance of the Gold Room shall be by the State Capitol Preservation Board at the direction of the governor;

(E)  the public restrooms;

(F)  the grand staircases;

(G)  the public stairways;

(H)  the public elevators;

(I)  the Capitol Rotunda;

(J)  the kitchen to the east of the dignitary protection elevator and pantry area which kitchen is to be scheduled and maintained by the State Capitol Preservation Board, with the governor's and Legislature's use associated with the Gold Room to be given scheduling priority; and

(K)  the open areas:

(I)  east of the Rotunda to the doors of the Capitol Board Room;

(II)  south of the Rotunda to the south entrance to the State Capitol; and

(III)  north of the Rotunda to the north wall;

(ii)  on the first floor: all office areas, conference rooms, stairways, and elevators, excluding the public corridors, public stairways, and public elevators:

(A)  west of the south entrance to the State Capitol on the first floor, including the dignitary holding area and elevator, which area and elevator the Legislature may schedule through the Utah Highway Patrol Dignitary Protection Bureau; but excluding the storage area that is directly to the north of the dignitary holding area;

(B)  west of the public elevator on the north side of the first floor; and

(C)  the northwest pier storage area; and

(iii)  in the basement:

(A)  the audio/video control rooms on the southwest side of the State Capitol are shared space with the Legislature as provided in Section 36-5-1;

(B)  all areas west of the westernmost hall and bordered by a hall on the north and a hall on the south of the areas, including the stairs and elevator, secured parking and all entrances and exits to the secured parking, and the Utah Highway Patrol Dignitary Protection Bureau office space, and excluding the areas north and south of the area designated in this Subsection (2) as the governor area;

(b)  in the Senate Building:

(i)  all office areas and conference rooms on the third floor that are south of the south stairway; and

(ii)  the Utah Highway Patrol Dignitary Protection Bureau office space in the basement;

(c) (i)  46 of the parking stalls in the underground parking facility known as Lot C located directly east of the State Capitol; and

(ii)  52 of the parking stalls in the underground parking facility known as Lot E located directly east of the Senate Building; and

(d)  any other area designated by the State Capitol Preservation Board as the governor area.

(3)  The governor area is reserved for the use and occupancy of the governor and lieutenant governor and their staff, committees, and functions.

(4)  The data centers in the Senate Building and State Capitol which are associated with the governor, lieutenant governor, or their staff space are the responsibility of the governor, and the maintenance of these data centers shall be by the State Capitol Preservation Board at the direction of the governor.

(5)  The governor shall exercise complete jurisdiction over the governor area, except for the following, which are the responsibility of the State Capitol Preservation Board:

(a)  the architectural integrity of the governor area, including:

(i)  restored historic architectural or design features;

(ii)  historic color schemes, decorative finishes, and stenciling;

(iii)  decorative light fixtures; and

(iv)  flooring;

(b)  control of the central mechanical and electrical core of the Senate Building and State Capitol on all floors;

(c)  control of the enclosure of the Senate Building and State Capitol from the exterior of the building to the interior of the exterior wall;

(d)  the roof of the Senate Building and State Capitol;

(e)  the utility and security tunnels between the underground parking structure and the Senate Building and State Capitol;

(f)  public restrooms of the Senate Building and State Capitol;

(g)  maintenance of all the elevators and stairways in the Senate Building and State Capitol; and

(h)  those functions the governor delegates in writing to be performed by the State Capitol Preservation Board.

(6)  The responsibility for the communications centers in the Senate Building and State Capitol is as provided in Subsection 36-5-1(6).

(7)  The State Capitol Preservation Board shall schedule and manage the Capitol Board Room on the second floor of the State Capitol.

(a)  The governor's and lieutenant governor's use of the Capitol Board Room for functions shall be given scheduling priority over other meetings, except as provided in Subsection (7)(b).  If the governor or lieutenant governor has need for the Capitol Board Room that has already been scheduled by another person, the governor or lieutenant governor shall be given the Capitol Board Room and as much notice as possible shall be given to the other person scheduling the room so that person may seek an alternative site.

(b)  During a general session or special session of the Legislature or on interim committee days designated by the Legislative Management Committee, a legislator's use of the Capitol Board Room for functions shall be given scheduling priority over any meeting, including the governor's or lieutenant governor's use under Subsection (7)(a).  If a legislator has need for the Capitol Board Room and it has already been scheduled by another person, the legislator shall be given the Capitol Board Room and as much notice as possible shall be given to the other person scheduling the room so that person may seek an alternative site.

(c)  When the Legislature is not in session and on non interim committee days, a legislator's use of the Capitol Board Room for functions shall be given scheduling priority over any meeting, other than the governor's or lieutenant governor's use under Subsection (7)(a).  If a legislator has need for the Capitol Board Room and it is not being used as provided in Subsection (7)(a), the legislator shall be given the Capitol Board Room and as much notice as possible shall be given to the other person scheduling the room so that person may seek an alternative site.

(d)  When not being used for a governor, lieutenant governor, or legislative function, the Capitol Board Room may be scheduled by the State Capitol Preservation Board on a first-come, first-served basis:

(i)  by other executive or judicial branch entities; and

(ii)  by a public or private person or organization who complies with State Capitol Preservation Board rules for Capitol Hill Complex Facility use.



Enacted by Chapter 10, 2008 General Session

